test/src/morphology/V-tuulda_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - tūlda: # Verb 11 'eng /est tulla/fin' - full paradigm
     tūlda+V+Inf: tūlda
     tūlda+V+Ger: tuldsõ
     tūlda+V+Sup: tu’lmõ
     tūlda+V+Sup+Ine: tu’lmõõs
     tūlda+V+Sup+Ela: tu’lmõõst
     tūlda+V+Sup+Tra: tu’lmõõks
     tūlda+V+Sup+Abe: tu’lmõõt
     tūlda+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tulāb
     tūlda+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tu’ltõ
     tūlda+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tulābõd
     tūlda+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tu’ļ
     tūlda+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tu’ļtõ
     tūlda+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tu’ļtõ
     tūlda+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: tu’l
     tūlda+V+Cond+Sg3: tulks
     tūlda+V+Imprt+Sg2: tu’l
     tūlda+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: tu’l
     tūlda+V+Imprt+Pl2: tulgid
     tūlda+V+Jus+Sg3: tulgõ
     tūlda+V+QuoSg3: tuļļi
     tūlda+V+ActPrfPrc: tund
     tūlda+V+PssPrfPrc: tuldõd
